North Carolina, session 2025, HB622.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 53D.
"Regulation of Large-Capacity Ammunition Magazines.
"§ 14-409.60. Definition.
For purposes of this Article, the term "large-capacity magazine" includes all of the following:
(i) a fixed or detachable magazine box, drum, feed strip, or similar device capable of accepting,
or that is designed to be readily converted to accept, more than 10 rounds of ammunition, (ii) a
fixed or detachable magazine that is capable of accepting more than eight shotgun shells, and
(iii) a detachable magazine, tube, box, drum, feed strip, or similar device that is capable of
accepting more than eight shotgun shells when combined with a fixed magazine. The term does
not include any of the following: (i) a feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it
cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds of ammunition, (ii) an attached tubular device
designed to accept and capable of operating only with .22 caliber rimfire ammunition, or (iii) a
tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.
"§ 14-409.61. Large-capacity magazines prohibited; penalties; exceptions.
(a) It is unlawful for a person to manufacture, sell, offer to sell, purchase, transfer, or
possess a large-capacity magazine. A violation of this subsection is a Class 2 misdemeanor;
provided, however, that a second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a Class 1
misdemeanor.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section commits a Class I felony under
this section if the person possessed a large-capacity magazine during the commission of a felony.
(c) The offense described in subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to any of the
following:
(1) An entity, or any employee thereof engaged in the employee's employment
duties, that manufactures large-capacity magazines within North Carolina
exclusively for transfer or any federally licensed gun dealer, or any employee
thereof engaged in his or her official employment duties, that sells
large-capacity magazines exclusively to any of the following:
a. A branch of the Armed Forces of the United States.
b. A department, agency, or political subdivision of the State of North
Carolina, any other state, or of the United States government.
*H622-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. A firearms retailer for the purpose of firearms sales conducted outside
the State.
d. A foreign national government that has been approved for such
transfers by the United States government.
e. An out-of-state transferee who may legally possess a large-capacity
magazine.
(2) An employee of any of the following agencies who bears a firearm in the
course of the employee's official duties:
a. A branch of the Armed Forces of the United States.
b. A department, agency, or political subdivision of the State of North
Carolina, any other state, or of the United States government.
(3) A person who possesses the magazine for the sole purpose of transporting the
magazine to an out-of-state entity on behalf of a manufacturer of
large-capacity magazines within North Carolina.
(4) A person who, on the effective date of this section, lawfully possessed a
large-capacity magazine if, within 180 days of the effective date of this
section, does any of the following:
a. Permanently modifies the large-capacity magazine so that it cannot
hold more than 10 rounds of ammunition.
b. Surrenders the large-capacity magazine to the local law enforcement
agency in the county or municipality where the person resides or the
State Bureau of Investigation.
c. Transfers or sells the large-capacity magazine to a federally licensed
gun dealer or person or firm outside of this State that is lawfully
entitled to own or possess a large-capacity magazine."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 622-First Edition